Washington statutes.
RCW 43.136.011

Findings—Intent.

The legislature recognizes that tax preferences are enacted to meet objectives which are determined to be in the public interest. However, some tax preferences may not be efficient or equitable tools for the achievement of current public policy objectives. Given the changing nature of the economy and tax structures of other states, the legislature finds that periodic performance audits of tax preferences are needed to determine if their continued existence will serve the public interest. The legislature further finds that tax preferences that are enacted for economic development purposes must demonstrate growth in full-time family-wage jobs with health and retirement benefits. Given that an opportunity cost exists with each economic choice, it is the intent of the legislature that the overall impact of economic development-focused tax preferences benefit the state's economy.

[ 2011 c 335 s 1; 2006 c 197 s 1.]